Hawaii, session 2025, HB333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that the first school bell ring no earlier than 8:30 a.m. nationwide.  Early school start times are associated with students sleeping less, and, along with irritability and fatigue, students who sleep less may experience difficulty paying attention in class, negatively affecting students' academic performance.  In Hawaii, all but five public high schools begin their school days before 8:30 a.m. The purpose of this Act is to require all public elementary, middle, and high schools to start school days no earlier than 8:30 a.m. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- School day start time.  (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, beginning with the    ‑ school year, all public elementary, middle, and high school classes in the State shall begin no earlier than 8:30 a.m.; provided that this section shall not apply to charter schools. (b)  The board, in its discretion, may grant a waiver to any school that is subject to this section.  The board shall adopt policies and procedures to grant a waiver under this subsection. (c) This section shall not exempt any school from the requirements under section 302A-251." SECTION 3.  The department of education shall adjust state‑provided school bus and school meal schedules for public schools to align with the class start times set forth in section 2 of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________